Oklahoma, session 2026, HB3791.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 7500 of Title 63, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. A physician, including allopathic and osteopathic, advanced
practice nurse practitioner, and physicians assistant shall have the
right to prescribe, recommend, or suggest holistic or natural
medicine or alternative treatment to patients under his or her care
if the health care provider believes the treatment will be effective
or beneficial to his or her patient to relieve pain or help cure the
patient's ailment.
B. A parent or legal guardian shall have the right to treat his
or her child with holistic or natural medicine or an alternative
ENGR. H. B. NO. 3791 Page 1

trea tment to what the health care provider suggests or recommends.
It shall be the parent or legal guardian's right to deviate from a
suggestion or recommendation from a health care provider if the
parent or legal guardian believes that is in the best interest of
the child.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.
Passed the House of Representatives the 24th day of March, 2026.


Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives

Passed the Senate the ___ day of __________, 2026.


Presiding Officer of the Senate










ENGR. H. B. NO. 3791 Page 2